Utah statutes.
48-2c-614.   Court-decreed termination of series.

On application by or for a member or manager associated with a series, the district court may decree termination of the series whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business of the series in conformity with an operating agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 92, 2006 General Session

